Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-220
Certification request; how invoked.

Sections 24-219 to 24-225 may be invoked by a written request of any of the courts referred to in section 24-219 upon such court's own motion, or upon the motion to that court of any attorney involved.

Laws 1982, LB 724, § 2.